Hawaii statutes.
§503B-1 Commissioners; appointment.
The lieutenant governor may appoint commissioners who shall serve for four
years from the date of the individual commissioner's respective appointment,
unless removed by the lieutenant governor. [L 2013, c 277, pt of §1; am L 2016,
c 78, §3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next